District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-420

Penalty for noncompliance with chapter.

Repealed.

History

Dec. 10, 1971, 85 Stat. 582, Pub. L. 92-180, § 20
Oct. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-42, § 425, 32 DCR 4450
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(n), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-420.
1981 Ed., § 29-620.
1973 Ed., § 29-1120.